District of Columbia statutes.
2-1215.71

Establishment of BIDs not limited.

The listing of specifically authorized BIDs in part B of this subchapter shall not be construed to prohibit the establishment of a BID in another area pursuant to the terms of this subchapter; provided, that any BID taxes, or BID tax increases, not authorized in part B of this subchapter (whether as adopted or amended by act of Council) shall not become effective until the effective date of an act of Council which makes such BID taxes effective.

May 29, 1996, D.C. Law 11-134, § 301
as added Mar. 17, 2005, D.C. Law 15-257, § 2(d), 52 DCR 1161
Apr. 7, 2006, D.C. Law 16-91, § 140(c), 52 DCR 10637
National capital revitalization corporation, tax increment revenue bonds, see § 2-1219.23.
National capital revitalization corporation, transfer, assignment, and assumption of powers and duties, see § 2-1219.29.
D.C. Law 16-91 made a technical change in the enacting clause of D.C. Law 15-257 which resulted in no change in text.